Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1590.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin NONTAXABILITY OF BACK PAY FOR SERVICE MEMBERS DISCHARGED DUE TO THE MILITARY'S COVID-19 VACCINATION MANDATE.new text end new text begin (a) The amount of military back pay for service members discharged under the military's COVID-19 vaccination mandate is a subtraction. new text end new text begin (b) For the purposes of this section, "military back pay for service members discharged under the military's COVID-19 vaccination mandate" means the amount authorized under section 2, paragraph (b), of Executive Order No. 14184, dated January 27, 2025, of the President of the United States. new text end new text begin (c) For the purposes of this section, "subtraction" has the meaning given in Minnesota Statutes, section 290.0132, subdivision 1, and the rules in that subdivision apply to this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end